Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Chapter 4. The Court of Appeals.
§ 17.1-408.
Time for filing; notice; opening brief; petition.

The notice of appeal to the Court of Appeals shall be filed in every case within the court’s appellate jurisdiction as provided in §

8.01-675.3

. The opening brief in a criminal case shall be filed not more than 40 days after the filing of the record with the Court of Appeals. However, an extension may be granted in the discretion of the Court of Appeals on motion for good cause shown. In an appeal pursuant to subsection B or C of §

19.2-398

, the petition for appeal shall be presented within the 40-day time limitation provided in this section.

Upon receiving a notice of appeal in a criminal case or, if notice of the appeal is received by the clerk prior to the entry of final judgment, upon entry of final judgment, the clerk of the circuit court shall cause a transcript to be prepared of the trial and any other circuit court proceedings, as requested by the appellant in the notice of appeal or by order of the circuit court, at the expense of the Commonwealth.

History.

1984, c. 701, § 17-116.05:3; 1998, c. 872; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489; 2022, c. 714.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, rewrote the section, which read, “The notice of appeal to the Court of Appeals shall be filed in every case within the court’s appellate jurisdiction as provided in §

8.01-675.3

. The petition for appeal in a criminal case shall be filed not more than forty days after the filing of the record with the Court of Appeals. However, a thirty-day extension may be granted in the discretion of the court in order to attain the ends of justice. When an appeal from an interlocutory decree or order is permitted in a criminal case, the petition for appeal shall be presented within the forty-day time limitation provided in this section.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 714, effective April 27, 2022, substituted “on motion for good cause shown” for “in order to attain the ends of justice” in the third sentence of the first paragraph.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 4-115. Notice of Appeal; 8-203. Notice of Appeal.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal & Error, § 129.

§ 17.1-409.
Certification to the Supreme Court.

In any case in which an appeal has been taken to or filed with the Court of Appeals, the Supreme Court in its discretion, on motion of the Court of Appeals, or on its own motion, may certify the case for review by the Supreme Court before it has been determined by the Court of Appeals. The effect of such certification shall be to transfer jurisdiction over the case to the Supreme Court for all purposes.

Such certification may be made only when, in its discretion, the Supreme Court determines that:

The case is of such imperative public importance as to justify the deviation from normal appellate practice and to require prompt decision in the Supreme Court; or

The docket or the status of the work of the Court of Appeals is such that the sound or expeditious administration of justice requires that jurisdiction over the case be transferred to the Supreme Court.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.06; 1984, c. 701; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-410.
Disposition of appeals; finality of decisions.

Each appeal of right taken to the Court of Appeals and each appeal for which a petition for appeal has been granted shall be considered by a panel of the court.When the Court of Appeals has (i) dismissed an appeal in any case in accordance with the Rules of Court or (ii) decided an appeal, its decision shall be final, without appeal to the Supreme Court, in:

Appeals in criminal cases pursuant to subsections A or E of §

19.2-398

and §

19.2-401

. Such finality of the Court of Appeals’ decision shall not preclude a defendant, if he is convicted, from requesting the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court on direct appeal to reconsider an issue which was the subject of the pretrial appeal; and

Appeals involving involuntary treatment of prisoners pursuant to §

53.1-40.1

or

53.1-133.04

.

Appeals involving denial of a concealed handgun permit pursuant to §

18.2-308.08

.

All other decisions of the Court of Appeals shall be appealable to the Supreme Court in accordance with the provisions of §

17.1-411

.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.07; 1984, c. 701; 1987, c. 710; 1988, c. 873; 1998, c. 872; 2000, c. 830; 2019, c. 809; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 830 substituted “Chapter 10.2 (§ 63.1-219.7 et seq.)” for “Chapter 11 (§ 63.1-220 et seq.)” in subdivision A 3.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 809, in subdivision A 5, added “or

53.1-133.04

” at the end.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, rewrote the section.

Cross references.

As to requirements for Petition for Appeal in an appeal to the Supreme Court of Virginia, see Rule 5:17, Rules of the Virginia Supreme Court.

Law Review.

For article, “The Subject Matter Jurisdiction of Virginia Courts in Divorce and Equitable Distribution Proceedings,” see 11 G.M.U. L. Rev. 73 (1989).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, §§ 20.1, 73, 137; 5A M.J. Courts, § 36.1.

§ 17.1-411.
Review by the Supreme Court.

Except where the decision of the Court of Appeals is made final under §

17.1-410

or §

19.2-408

, any party aggrieved by a final decision of the Court of Appeals, including the Commonwealth, may petition the Supreme Court for an appeal. The Commonwealth, or any county, city, or town, may also petition the Supreme Court for review pursuant to §

19.2-317

. The granting of such petitions shall be in the discretion of the Supreme Court.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.08; 1997, c. 358; 1998, c. 872.

Law Review.

For essay, “The Court of Appeals of Virginia Celebrates Thirty Years of Service to the Commonwealth,” see 50 U. Rich. L. Rev. 217 (2015).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Appeal and Error, § 20.1; 5A M.J. Courts, § 36.1.

§ 17.1-412.
Affirmance, reversal, or modification of judgment; petition for appeal to Supreme Court upon award of new trial.

A judgment, order, conviction, or decree of a circuit court or award of the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission may be affirmed, or it may be reversed, modified, or set aside by the Court of Appeals for errors appearing in the record. If the decision of the Court of Appeals is to reverse and remand the case for a new trial, any party aggrieved by the granting of the new trial may accept the remand or proceed to petition for appeal in the Supreme Court pursuant to §

17.1-411

.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.09; 1984, c. 701; 1998, c. 872.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 80.

§ 17.1-413.
Opinions; reporting, printing and electronic publication.

The Court of Appeals shall state in writing the reasons for its ruling in a case. Subject to rules promulgated under §

17.1-403

the Court in its discretion may render its decision by order or memorandum opinion. All orders and opinions of the Court of Appeals shall be preserved with the record of the case. Opinions designated by the Court of Appeals as having precedential value or as otherwise having significance for the law or legal system shall be expeditiously reported in separate Court of Appeals Reports in the same manner as the decisions and opinions of the Supreme Court. The clerk of the Court of Appeals shall retain in the clerk’s office a list and brief summary of the case for all unpublished decisions and opinions of the Court of Appeals. The list of cases and summary shall be made available to any person upon request.

The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall contract for the printing of the reports of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals and for the advance sheets of each court. He shall select a printer for the reports and prescribe such contract terms as will ensure issuance of the reports as soon as practicable after a sufficient number of opinions are filed. He shall make such contracts after consultation with the Department of General Services and shall distribute these reports in accordance with the applicable provisions of law. He shall also provide for the electronic publication on the Internet of the opinions of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals subject to conditions and restrictions established by each court regarding the electronic publication of its opinions.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.010; 1984, cc. 635, 701; 1997, c. 316; 1998, c. 872; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “ruling in a case” for “decision (i) rejecting a petition for appeal or (ii) deciding a case after hearing” in subsection A.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Family Law,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Unpublished opinions. —

Section

17.1-413

states that opinions designated by the Court of Appeals of Virginia as having precedential value or as otherwise having significance for the law or legal system shall be expeditiously reported in separate court of appeals reports in the same manner as the decisions and opinions of the Supreme Court of Virginia. By implication, unpublished court of appeals’ opinions have no precedential effect. Friedberg v. Hague Park Apts., 61 Va. Cir. 589, 2001 Va. Cir. LEXIS 518 (Norfolk Dec. 3, 2001).

Where a circuit court’s opinion was not designated for publication and, therefore, had no precedential value, the opinion was cited merely for persuasive reasoning and language and not as precedent. Moran v. Commonwealth, 73 Va. Cir. 241, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 225 (Rockingham County Apr. 4, 2007).

§ 17.1-414.
Facilities and supplies.

The Court of Appeals shall be housed in the City of Richmond and, if practicable, in the same building occupied by the Supreme Court. When facilities are required for the convening of panels in other areas of the Commonwealth, the chief judge of the Court of Appeals shall provide for such physical facilities as are available for the operation of the Court of Appeals. The Court of Appeals may use any public property of, or any property leased or rented to, the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions for the holding of court and for its ancillary functions upon proper agreement with the applicable authorities. The Court of Appeals also may use any federal courtroom, the moot courtroom of any accredited law school located in the Commonwealth, or any other facility deemed adequate for the holding of court and for its ancillary functions upon proper agreement with the applicable authorities. Any expense incurred for use of such facilities may be paid from the funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the Court of Appeals.

The Court of Appeals shall purchase such books, pamphlets, publications, supplies, furnishings, and equipment as necessary for the efficient operation of the Court, and the cost thereof shall be paid by the clerk from the appropriation for the operation of the Court of Appeals.

The Court of Appeals shall utilize the State Law Library provided by §

42.1-60

.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.011; 1984, c. 701; 1998, c. 872; 2020, cc. 67, 197.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 67 and 197 are identical, and substituted “also may use any federal courtroom, the moot courtroom of any accredited law school located in the Commonwealth, or any other facility deemed adequate” for “may use any federal courtroom or other facility” in the penultimate sentence in subsection A.

§ 17.1-415.
Compensation for judges; expenses.

The judges of the Court of Appeals shall receive from the Commonwealth an annual salary that shall be fixed in the general appropriations act and set at an amount equal to ninety-five percent of the annual salary fixed by law for justices of the Supreme Court. The Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals shall receive $3,000 per year in addition to the amount received by the other judges of the Court of Appeals. Each judge shall receive such amount as shall be fixed in the general appropriations act for all other expenses not otherwise reimbursed and incurred incident to the conduct of the business of the court.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.012; 1998, c. 872; 2001, c. 35; 2006, c. 218.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 35 substituted “for” for “in lieu of travel, lodging and” following “general appropriations act,” and inserted “not otherwise reimbursed and” in the last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 218 substituted “$3,000” for “$1,000” in the second sentence.

§ 17.1-416.
Clerk; seal; deputies and other employees; clerk’s fees.

There shall be a clerk of the Court of Appeals, who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Court of Appeals. The clerk shall adopt a separate seal of office for the Court of Appeals as approved by the Court of Appeals. The number and salaries of the deputies and other employees necessary to perform the duties of the Court of Appeals shall be fixed by the Court of Appeals. The Supreme Court by rule of court may promulgate uniform fees for services rendered by the clerk.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.013; 1988, c. 391; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-417.
Support staff.

Each judge of the Court of Appeals shall be entitled to the services of such support staff as shall be authorized by and paid from the appropriation to the Court of Appeals.

History.

1983, c. 413, § 17-116.014; 1984, c. 701; 1998, c. 872; 2001, c. 35.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 35 substituted “such support staff as shall be authorized by and” for “one research assistant, who shall be a graduate of an accredited law school. Each judge shall also be entitled to the services of a secretary. The salaries of the research assistants and secretaries shall be fixed by the Court of Appeals and shall be.”

§ 17.1-418.
Fees charged by Clerk of the Court of Appeals.

The Clerk of the Court of Appeals shall charge the following fees:

For filing a notice of appeal or initiating any matter under the original jurisdiction of the court, $50 payable by check or money order to the Clerk of the Court of Appeals. Twenty-five dollars of each fee collected under this section shall be apportioned to the Courts Technology Fund established under §

17.1-132

.

For making and certifying a copy of any record or document in the Clerk’s office, ten cents per 100 words or twenty-five cents per page.

For verifying and certifying any record or document not actually copied by the Clerk, one-half of the fee for copying and certifying, which shall not, however, be applied to the certification of a copy of the record in the Court which has already been printed.

For authentication of any record, document or paper under the seal of the Court, fifty cents.

For copying and certifying any document or paper of less than 250 words, twenty-five cents.

For all other services not specifically mentioned above, the same fee that would be charged by a clerk of a circuit court in similar cases.

History.

1992, c. 253, § 14.1-120.1; 1998, c. 872; 2006, cc. 623, 718.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 623 and 718 are identical, and in subdivision 1, substituted “$50” for “twenty-five dollars” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.